West Virginia, session 2025, HB2263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16-9A-8 of this code, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner (tobacco products in vending machines, 175 CSR 09), is authorized.